es: Contenido de alcohol: Sin alcohol; Contiene alcohol; Alto contenido de alcohol (>10%); Bajo contenido de alcohol (≤5%); Contenido moderado de alcohol (5-10%); Otros
nb: Alkoholinnhold: Alkoholfri; Inneholder alkohol; Høyt alkoholinnhold (>10%); Lavt alkoholinnhold (≤5%); Moderat alkoholinnhold (5–10%); Annet
el: Περιεκτικότητα σε αλκοόλ: Χωρίς αλκοόλ; Περιέχει αλκοόλ; Υψηλή περιεκτικότητα αλκοόλ (>10%); Χαμηλή περιεκτικότητα αλκοόλ (≤5%); Μέτρια περιεκτικότητα αλκοόλ (5–10%); Άλλο
pl: Zawartość alkoholu: Bezalkoholowy; Zawiera alkohol; Wysoka zawartość alkoholu (>10%); Niska zawartość alkoholu (≤5%); Umiarkowana zawartość alkoholu (5–10%); Inne
th: ปริมาณแอลกอฮอล์: ปราศจากแอลกอฮอล์; มีแอลกอฮอล์; แอลกอฮอล์สูง (>10%); แอลกอฮอล์ต่ำ (≤5%); แอลกอฮอล์ปานกลาง (5–10%); อื่นๆ
nl: Alcoholgehalte: Alcoholvrij; Bevat alcohol; Hoog alcoholgehalte (>10%); Laag alcoholgehalte (≤5%); Matig alcoholgehalte (5-10%); Andere
pt-BR: Teor de álcool: Não contém álcool; Contém álcool; Alto teor alcoólico (>10%); Baixo teor alcoólico (≤5%); Teor alcoólico moderado (5–10%); Outro
ja: アルコール含有量: アルコールフリー; アルコール含有; 高アルコール（10%超）; 低アルコール（5%以下）; 中程度のアルコール（5-10%）; その他
sk-SK: Obsah alkoholu: Bez alkoholu; Obsahuje alkohol; Vysoký obsah alkoholu (>10%); Nízky obsah alkoholu (≤5%); Stredný obsah alkoholu (5–10%); Iné
hu: Alkoholtartalom: Alkoholmentes; Tartalmaz alkoholt; Magas alkoholtartalom (>10%); Alacsony alkoholtartalom (≤5%); Közepes alkoholtartalom (5–10%); Egyéb
tr: Alkol içeriği: Alkolsüz; Alkol içerir; Yüksek alkol (>%10); Düşük alkol (≤%5); Orta alkol (%5-10); Diğer
ro-RO: Conținut de alcool: Fără alcool; Conține alcool; Alcool ridicat (>10%); Alcool scăzut (≤5%); Alcool moderat (5–10%); Altele
ko: 알코올 함량: 무알코올; 알코올 함유; 고알코올(10% 초과); 저알코올(5% 이하); 중간 알코올(5-10%); 기타
sl-SI: Vsebnost alkohola: Brez alkohola; Vsebuje alkohol; Visoka vsebnost alkohola (>10 %); Nizka vsebnost alkohola (≤5 %); Zmerna vsebnost alkohola (5–10 %); Drugo
da: Alkoholindhold: Alkoholfri; Indeholder alkohol; Høj alkohol (>10%); Lav alkohol (≤5%); Moderat alkohol (5-10%); Andet
cs: Obsah alkoholu: Bez alkoholu; Obsahuje alkohol; Vysoký obsah alkoholu (>10 %); Nízký obsah alkoholu (≤5 %); Střední obsah alkoholu (5–10 %); Jiné
en: Alcohol content: Alcohol-free; Contains alcohol; High alcohol (>10%); Low alcohol (≤5%); Moderate alcohol (5–10%); Other
pt-PT: Teor de álcool: Sem álcool; Contém álcool; Alto teor alcoólico (>10%); Baixo teor alcoólico (≤5%); Teor alcoólico moderado (5–10%); Outro
hr-HR: Sadržaj alkohola: Bez alkohola; Sadrži alkohol; Visok sadržaj alkohola (>10%); Nizak sadržaj alkohola (≤5%); Umjeren sadržaj alkohola (5–10%); Ostalo
fr: Teneur en alcool: Sans alcool; Contient de l'alcool; Forte teneur en alcool (>10 %); Faible teneur en alcool (≤5 %); Teneur modérée en alcool (5-10 %); Autre
zh-CN: 酒精含量: 不含酒精; 含酒精; 高酒精度 (>10%); 低酒精度 (≤5%); 中等酒精度 (5-10%); 其他
de: Alkoholgehalt: Alkoholfrei; Enthält Alkohol; Hoher Alkoholgehalt (>10%); Niedriger Alkoholgehalt (≤5%); Mäßiger Alkoholgehalt (5–10%); Sonstiges
zh-TW: 酒精含量: 無酒精; 含酒精; 高酒精（>10%）; 低酒精（≤5%）; 中度酒精（5–10%）; 其他
bg-BG: Съдържание на алкохол: Без алкохол; Съдържа алкохол; Висок алкохол (>10%); Нисък алкохол (≤5%); Умерен алкохол (5–10%); Други
it: Contenuto di alcol: Senza alcol; Contiene alcol; Alto contenuto alcolico (>10%); Basso contenuto alcolico (≤5%); Contenuto alcolico moderato (5-10%); Altro
ru: Содержание спирта: Без спирта; Содержит спирт; Высокое содержание спирта (>10%); Низкое содержание спирта (≤5%); Умеренное содержание спирта (5–10%); Другой
sv: Alkoholhalt: Alkoholfri; Innehåller alkohol; Hög alkoholhalt (>10%); Låg alkoholhalt (≤5%); Måttlig alkoholhalt (5–10%); Övrigt
vi: Hàm lượng cồn: Không cồn; Có chứa cồn; Nồng độ cồn cao (>10%); Nồng độ cồn thấp (≤5%); Nồng độ cồn trung bình (5–10%); Khác
fi: Alkoholipitoisuus: Alkoholiton; Sisältää alkoholia; Korkea alkoholipitoisuus (>10%); Matala alkoholipitoisuus (≤5%); Kohtalainen alkoholipitoisuus (5–10%); Muu
lt-LT: Alkoholio kiekis: Be alkoholio; Su alkoholiu; Daug alkoholio (>10%); Mažai alkoholio (≤5%); Vidutiniškai alkoholio (5–10%); Kita